Utah statutes.
70A-8-206.    Completion or alteration of security certificate.

(1)  If a security certificate contains the signatures necessary to its issue or transfer but is incomplete in any other respect:

(a)  any person may complete it by filling in the blanks as authorized; and

(b)  even if the blanks are incorrectly filled in, the security certificate as completed is enforceable by a purchaser who took it for value and without notice of the incorrectness.

(2)  A complete security certificate that has been improperly altered, even if fraudulently, remains enforceable, but only according to its original terms.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 204, 1996 General Session

